Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB911.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 100.326 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Car washing" means the use of a site for washing and cleaning of motor
vehicles, in which patrons generally remain in the vehicle, or other light-
duty motor vehicles or equipment in a commercial zone;
(b) "Commercial zone" means any business, professional, or commercial zone
and includes zones for job creation or economic development and mixed-
use zones in which residential units are permitted within a zoning category
that would otherwise qualify as a commercial zone;
(c) "Drive-through facilities" means one (1) or more openings in the wall of a
structure or building designed and intended to be used to provide for sale to
or service to patrons who remain in their motor vehicles, and includes
related facilities including:
1. Menu boards;
2. Order points; and
3. Motor vehicle stacking areas within off-street vehicle areas;
(d) "Electric vehicle charging station" has the same meaning as in KRS 138.477;
(e) "Major public roads" means public roads designated as arterial roads or
collector roads within a city and public roads designated as part of the state
primary system, state secondary system, or as supplement roads by the
Department of Highways as authorized in KRS 177.020;
(f) "Off-street vehicle area" means an open, surfaced area for temporary
parking of motor vehicles, other than the rights-of-way of a public street or
parking structure, and the movement of motor vehicles through a
development, including through drive-thru facilities and drive aisles of a
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
development;[ and]
(g)[ (b)] "Retail filling station" has the same meaning as in KRS 138.210;[.]
(h) "Site plan" means a plan that is less detailed and specific than a
development plan but includes the conceptual arrangement of structures
and buildings, off-street vehicle areas, open spaces, access points, and any
other site design features; and
(i) "Vehicle and equipment sale or repair establishment" means an
establishment and lots for the display, rental, and sale of motor vehicles,
recreational vehicles, motorcycles, boats, contractor equipment, farm
equipment, or other light-duty vehicles or equipment or supplies for those
vehicles or equipment and minor repairs and routine maintenance,
including car washing within a commercial zone.
(2) A planning unit[city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or
consolidated local government] shall not [utilize a zoning process, or ]adopt or
enforce an ordinance[, order], regulation, or similar measure that:
(a) Prohibits or limits a retail filling station or a vehicle and equipment sale or
repair establishment from locating at any place within its jurisdiction at
which other businesses[ of similar uses or character] which serve the public in
the same zoning category may locate;
(b) Could be reasonably construed to apply discriminatory treatment to the use or
location of retail filling stations or vehicle and equipment sale or repair
establishments;[ or]
(c) Treats retail filling stations differently than electric vehicle charging stations;
(d) Prohibits fuel dispensers or a canopy for a retail filling station from being
located between the principal structures or buildings and any right-of-way
of a public street;
(e) Prohibits the display of vehicles, supplies, or equipment for a vehicle and
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
equipment sale or repair establishment from being located between the
principal structures or buildings and any rights-of-way of a public street or
imposes a maximum display area within an off-street vehicle area;
(f) Imposes standards or siting requirements more stringent than applicable
state or federal regulations or requirements related to underground storage
tanks for a retail filling station or a vehicle and equipment sale or repair
establishment;
(g) Requires a retail filling station or vehicle and equipment sale or repair
establishment to install or invest in particular fueling infrastructure other
than that required by state or federal law or regulation, including electric
vehicle charging stations;
(h) Imposes a maximum number of fuel dispensers for a retail filling station;
(i) Prohibits a retail filling station or a vehicle and equipment sale or repair
establishment from locating within a development in a commercial zone
along a major public road, except a planning unit may prohibit a retail
filling station or a vehicle and equipment sale or repair establishment from
locating in a central business district and may designate a retail filling
station or vehicle and equipment sale or repair establishment as a
conditional use in its land use code and zoning regulations to allow the
proper integration of the use into the community at suitable locations in the
commercial zone. A planning unit shall not deny or conditionally approve a
conditional use permit unless it determines a denial or conditional approval
is necessary and appropriate due to a specific threat to public health, safety,
or welfare as to a specific location by clear and convincing evidence and the
denial or conditions are the least restrictive means to mitigate that specific
threat;
(j) Prohibits or effectively prohibits a new retail filling station or vehicle and
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
equipment sale or repair establishment from locating within a development
in a commercial zone near an existing retail filling station or vehicle and
equipment sale or repair establishment through a policy concerning
clustering, density, distancing, or other metric;
(k) Mandates access by the general public to privately owned land, including
open space or off-street vehicle areas, in a development in a commercial
zone, except the general public may have access to rights-of-way of a public
street;
(l) Requires more than five percent (5%) open space or permeable surface
within a development in a commercial zone;
(m) Requires more than ten percent (10%) tree canopy or the preservation of
existing trees in a development in a commercial zone, except a planning
unit may require street trees within rights-of-way of a public street;
(n) Imposes minimum size, width, height, bulk of structures and buildings, or
minimum floor area to ground area ratios within a development in a
commercial zone;
(o) Requires a minimum residential density within a development in a
commercial zone;
(p) Requires construction of walkways with widths greater than five (5) feet
within a development in a commercial zone, except a planning unit may
contribute funds to a developer for the full cost of constructing wider
walkways within rights-of-way of a public street;
(q) Requires construction of elevated or raised walkways within a development
in a commercial zone;
(r) Imposes a maximum off-street vehicle area, limits the place at which an off-
street vehicle area may be located, or prohibits an off-street vehicle area
from being located within a setback area within a development in a
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
commercial zone, except a planning unit may impose screening
requirements or a buffer of not greater than five (5) feet in width along the
boundary of an off-street vehicle area and a residential zone or rights-of-
way of a public street;
(s) Imposes a concurrency requirement for which principal structures or
buildings for certain permitted uses shall be required to be constructed prior
to the occupancy or construction of other principal structures or buildings
for other permitted uses within a development in a commercial zone, except
a planning unit may require the construction transportation, utility,
communication, and similar facilities prior to the occupancy of structures
or buildings;
(t) Requires the installation of transit or bicycle infrastructure within a
development in a commercial zone, except a planning unit may require a
bicycle lane not greater than five (5) feet in width within the adjacent public
street and may contribute funds to a developer for the full cost of
constructing wider bicycle lanes, protected bicycle lanes, and other bicycle
infrastructure and transit infrastructure within rights-of-way of a public
street;
(u) Mandates a particular orientation of structures or buildings or a particular
layout of a development in a commercial zone, except a planning unit may
impose screening requirements for structures or buildings along the
boundary of a residential zone and generally applicable setback lines, but
not build-to lines;
(v) Imposes architectural or other visual requirements or restrictions upon
development in a commercial zone, except in areas zoned historic;
(w) Prohibits drive-through facilities within a development in a commercial
zone along a major public road, except a planning unit may prohibit drive-
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
through facilities in a central business district and may designate a drive-
through facilities as a conditional use in its land use code and zoning
regulations to allow the proper integration of the use into the community at
suitable locations in the commercial zone. A planning unit shall not deny or
conditionally approve a conditional use permit unless it determines a denial
or conditional approval is necessary and appropriate due to a specific threat
to public health, safety, or welfare as to a specific location by clear and
convincing evidence and the denial or conditions are the least restrictive
means to mitigate that specific threat;
(x) Requires the preservation of a structure or building, except a planning unit
may require preservation in areas zoned historic; or
(y) Designates a property in a commercial zone as part of an area zoned
historic without the written consent of the landowner.
(3) (a) Any ordinance or regulation contrary to subsection (2) of this section is void
and unenforceable.
(b) A planning unit shall not condition an approval on a developer's acceptance
of any condition that is prohibited under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) This section shall not:
(a) Alleviate a developer or planning unit's obligations to provide accessible
parking spaces as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C.
sec. 12101 et seq.;
(b) Be construed to prohibit a planning unit from:
1. Adopting or enforcing any ordinance, regulation, or similar measure
related to environmental features, erosion, stormwater management,
waterways, or wastewater management, including a requirement that
a development in a commercial zone obtain service documents, if the
measure is applicable to all other permitted uses in the zoning
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
category, and as to environmental features and waterways, the
planning unit shall be otherwise specifically authorized to adopt the
measure under state or federal law and the measure is not more
stringent than the corresponding state or federal regulations or
requirements;
2. Designating the zones in which retail filling stations, vehicle and
equipment sale or repair establishments, or drive-through facilities
shall be permitted uses; or
3. Adopting or enforcing any ordinance, regulation, or similar measure
that is generally applicable to all uses within a commercial zone, and
that is not otherwise preempted or prohibited by state or federal law.
(5) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a proposed
development of a single principal structure or building on a single lot in a
commercial zone that proposes a permitted use that meets the criteria
outlined in a local government's land use and zoning regulations adopted by
the planning unit shall be approved without a development plan.
(b) A planning unit may require a site plan for an application for a variance, waiver,
conditional use permit, or map amendment for a proposed development of a
single principal structure or building on a single lot in a commercial zone.
(6) A person aggrieved by a planning unit's violation of this section shall have a
cause of action in the Circuit Court in the county in which the planning unit is
located. The Circuit Court shall review the alleged violation of this section de
novo. The Circuit Court:
(a) Shall award a person that prevails against the planning unit reasonable
attorney's fees and court costs to be paid by the local government; or
(b) May award a planning unit that prevails against a person who has brought
suit under this section reasonable attorney's fees and court costs to be paid
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2509
by that person, if the Circuit Court determines that the suit was frivolous or
meritless[
This section shall not prohibit a local jurisdiction identified in subsection (2) of this
section from subjecting retail filling stations to restrictions similar to those
applicable to other businesses that:
(a) Provide siting requirements, including siting requirements involving certain
geographic areas;
(b) Do not effectively prohibit the operation of a retail filling station; and
(c) Are not preempted by state or federal law].
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A planning unit's activities shall be subject to the land use and planning and zoning
regulations adopted by the planning unit. A planning unit shall not make any of its
own activities exempt from its own land use or planning and zoning regulations.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed